nl: Type motorfiets/scooter: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-scooter; Bromfiets; Offroad; Sport; Driewielig; Toeren; Andere
nb: Type motorsykkel/scooter: Cruiser; Dobbelsport; Maxi-scooter; Moped; Off-road; Sport; Trehjuls; Tur; Annen
pl: Typ motocykla/skutera: Krążownik; Podwójny sport; Hulajnoga maxi; Moped; Off-road; Sport; Trzykołowy; Na trasy; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 摩托车/小摩托车类型: 巡逻警车; 两用运动型; 大型滑板车; 轻便摩托车; 越野; 体育; 三轮; 旅行胎; 其他
lt-LT: Motociklo / motorolerio tipas: Kruizinis; „Dual-sport“; „Maxi“ motoroleris; Mopedas; Bekelės; Sportinis; Trijų ratų; Turistinis; Kita
hu: Motorkerékpár/robogó típusa: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-robogó; Moped; Terep; Sport; Háromkerekű; Túra; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de motociclo/scooter: Cruiser; Dual sport; Maxi scooter; Ciclomotor; Todo-o-terreno; Desporto; Três rodas; Passeio; Outro
bg-BG: Тип мотоциклет/скутер: Всъдеход; Dual-sport; Maxi-scooter; Мотопед; Офроуд; Спорт; Три колела; Туринг; Други
tr: Motosiklet/Scooter tipi: Cruiser; Çift spor; Maxi-scooter; Moped; Arazi dışı; Spor; Üç tekerlekli; Touring; Diğer
fi: Moottoripyörä-/skootterityyppi: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-skootteri; Mopo; Maasto; Urheilu; Kolmipyöräinen; Touring; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta motocikla/skutera: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maksi skuter; Moped; Terenski; Sportski; Tri kotača; Touring; Ostalo
ja: バイク/スクーターの種類: クルーザー; デュアルスポーツ; マキシスクーター; 原付; オフロード; スポーツ; 三輪; ツーリング; その他
ro-RO: Tip motocicletă/scuter: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-scuter; Moped; Teren accidentat; Sport; Trei roți; Călătorii lungi; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de motocicleta/scooter: Cruiser; Esportiva dupla; Maxi-scooter; Ciclomotor; Fora da estrada; Esporte; Três rodas; Passeio; Outro
ko: 오토바이/스쿠터 유형: 순찰차; 듀얼 스포츠; 맥시스쿠터; 모터 달린 자전거; 오프로드; 스포츠; 삼륜; 투어링; 기타
en: Motorcycle/Scooter type: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-scooter; Moped; Off-road; Sport; Three-wheel; Touring; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta motornega kolesa/skuterja: Križarsko; Terensko in cestno; Maksi skuter; Moped; Terenski; Šport; Trikolesnik; Turni; Drugo
sv: Motorcykel-/skotertyp: Kryssare; Dubbelsport; Maxi-skoter; Moped; Terräng; Sport; Trehjulig; Touring; Annat
ru: Тип мотоцикла/скутера: Круизер; Двойного назначения; Макси-скутер; Мопед; Внедорожный; Спортивный; Трехколесный; Туристический; Другой
th: ประเภทรถจักรยานยนต์/สกูตเตอร์: ครูสเซอร์; รถมอเตอร์ไซค์ดูอัลสปอร์ต; แม็กซี่สกู๊ตเตอร์; แบบจักรยานยนต์ขนาดเล็ก; รถออฟโรด; กีฬา; สามล้อ; ทัวริ่ง; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος μοτοσικλέτας/σκούτερ: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-scooter; Μοτοποδήλατο; Εκτός δρόμου; Αθλητισμός; Τρίτροχη; Περιήγησης; Άλλο
da: Motorcykel/scootertype: Cruiser; Dual-sport; Maxi-scooter; Knallert; Off-road; Sport; Tre-hjulet; Touring; Andet
sk-SK: Typ motocykla/skútra: Krížnik; Duálny šport; Maxi-kolobežka; Moped; Off-road; Šport; Trojkolesový; Touring; Iné
vi: Loại xe máy/xe tay ga: Lốp không gấp; Thể thao kép; Xe tay ga cỡ lớn; Công suất thấp; Địa hình; Sport; Xe ba bánh; Lốp đi phượt; Khác
zh-TW: 摩托車/小型機車類型: 徑向; 多功能; 大型踏板車; 輕型踏板車; 越野; 運動; 三輪; 旅行; 其他
de: Motorrad-/Rollertyp: Cruiser; Dual-Sport; Maxi-Scooter; Moped; Offroad; Sport; Dreirädrig; Touring; Sonstiges
fr: Type de moto/scooter: Croiseur; Double sport; Maxi-scooter; Vélomoteur; Tout-terrain; Sport; Trois roues; Tourisme; Autre
cs: Typ motocyklu/skútru: Cruiser; Univerzální sportovní; Maxiskútr; Moped; Terénní; Sport; Tříkolový; Cestovní; Jiné
es: Tipo de motocicleta/scooter: Crucero; Doble uso; Maxi-scooter; Ciclomotor; Todoterreno; Deportivo; Tres ruedas; Turismo; Otros
it: Tipo di motociclo/scooter: Cruiser; Dual sport; Maxi-scooter; Ciclomotore; Fuoristrada; Sport; Tre ruote; Da viaggio; Altro